Illinois, session 104th, HB3301.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by adding Section 529-21 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/29-21 new)7    Sec. 29-21. Harassment of election workers.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Election worker" means an individual who is an election 10official, poll worker, or an election volunteer in connection 11with the administration of an election for local, State, or 12federal office.13    "Election-related duties" include, but are not limited to, 14any of the following:15        (1) creating, disseminating, collecting, or delivering 16    voter applications or ballots;17        (2) registering voters;18        (3) opening, closing, operating, and maintaining order 19    at polling places and early voting sites;20        (4) processing and assisting voters at polling places 21    or early voting sites;22        (5) processing, tabulating, and tallying ballots; and23        (6) certifying election results.  HB3301- 2 -LRB104 11026 SPS 21108 b1    (b) It is unlawful for any person to intimidate, threaten, 2coerce, use violence or force, or attempt to intimidate, 3threaten, coerce, or use violence or force against:4    (1) an election worker in the performance or discharge of 5    his or her election-related duties; or6    (2) an individual who is lawfully present at a polling 7    place or a location where a canvass of votes is conducted. 8    (c) Any person who violates this Section is guilty of a 9Class A misdemeanor for a first offense and a Class 4 felony 10for a second or subsequent offense committed within 3 years of 11a previous conviction for the same offense.